Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 9. Benefits.
§ 51.1-165.
Optional benefits.

Any member not taking 50/10 retirement as provided in §

51.1-153

or

51.1-216

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member, may elect to have his retirement allowance payable under one of the options set forth in this subsection and receive the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him. The election of an optional benefit shall be subject to the approval of the Board.

Straight life option. — A member may elect to receive an increased retirement allowance in lieu of any death benefits.

Joint and last-survivor option. — A member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during his lifetime in order that a fraction of such retirement allowance be continued to a contingent annuitant at the death of the member. The amount to be received by the contingent annuitant, in accordance with such election by the member, shall not exceed 100 percent of the amount to be received by the member during his lifetime nor shall it be less than 10 percent of such amount. In case of such an election, death benefits that might otherwise be provided shall not be payable upon the death of the member unless death of the member occurs prior to the effective date of retirement as set forth in subsection C of this section. This option may be elected if the contingent annuitant is the spouse of the member. If the contingent annuitant is not the spouse of the member, this option may be elected only if the actuarial present value of the payments expected to be made to the member is greater than one-half of the actuarial present value of the total payments expected to be made to the member and contingent annuitant.

Level income option. — If a member retires from service prior to his retirement age, as such term is defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended), he may elect to receive an increased retirement allowance beginning on the member’s effective date of retirement and continuing until the member reaches age 62 or any whole age up to his normal retirement age, as such term is defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended) and a decreased retirement allowance thereafter, thereby providing a more nearly level retirement allowance when such decreased retirement allowance is added to his anticipated primary benefits under the federal Social Security Act. In determining the amount of such retirement allowance under this option before the electing retiree reaches his retirement age, as such term is defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended), the Board may use an estimate of the member’s anticipated social security benefit for computing the amount of such retirement allowance. Any member electing to receive such an allowance shall not be entitled to a joint and last survivor benefit. The amount of the increased retirement allowance shall be determined actuarially, but the election of this option shall not result in more than a 50 percent reduction in the member’s benefit as provided in §

51.1-155

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-217

, or

51.1-306

.

Any member taking 50/10 retirement as provided in §

51.1-153

or

51.1-216

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member, may elect to have his retirement allowance payable under the option set forth in this subsection and receive the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him. The election of this optional benefit shall be subject to the approval of the Board.50/10 retirement joint and last-survivor option. — A member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during his lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued after his death to a contingent annuitant during the lifetime of such person. The retirement allowance pursuant to this option shall be determined as provided in subdivision A 5 of §

51.1-155

or subsection A of §

51.1-217

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member, except (i) the present value of future retirement benefits shall be calculated based on the life expectancies of both the member and the contingent annuitant and (ii) the actuarially computed present value of the payments expected to be made under this option shall be actuarially equivalent to the actuarially computed present value of the payments expected to be made to the member as determined pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

51.1-155

or subsection A of §

51.1-217

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member.

The election of any one of the options stated in this section shall be null and void if the member dies prior to the Board receiving written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement. The election of a joint and last-survivor option shall be null and void if the contingent annuitant dies before the member’s retirement. Except as provided in subdivision 2 of this subsection, in all cases where the death of the member occurs prior to the effective date of retirement but after the Board has received written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement, benefits shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-163

and the requirement that the member be in service shall not apply. For purposes of this subdivision, retirement shall be deemed to commence on the effective date of a member’s service retirement or disability.
C. 1. The election of any one of the options stated in this section shall be null and void if the member dies prior to the Board receiving written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement. The election of a joint and last-survivor option shall be null and void if the contingent annuitant dies before the member’s retirement. Except as provided in subdivision 2 of this subsection, in all cases where the death of the member occurs prior to the effective date of retirement but after the Board has received written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement, benefits shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-163

and the requirement that the member be in service shall not apply. For purposes of this subdivision, retirement shall be deemed to commence on the effective date of a member’s service retirement or disability.

If (i) the death of the member occurs prior to the effective date of retirement but after the Board has received written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement; (ii) the member died while in service; (iii) at the time of the member’s death the election for payment of the member’s retirement allowance was a joint and last-survivor optional retirement benefit; and (iv) the member named his spouse, minor child, or parent as the contingent annuitant under the joint and last-survivor optional benefit, then benefits shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-163

. However, if such contingent annuitant or annuitants are the same person or persons who would receive a monthly benefit under subsection B of §

51.1-162

and the monthly benefit under such subsection would be greater than the benefit provided in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-163

, then retirement benefits shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of subsection B of §

51.1-162

.For purposes of this subdivision, retirement shall be deemed to commence on the effective date of a member’s service retirement or disability.

A member who has elected any of the options stated in this section may revoke such an election by written notification to the Board any time prior to the later of the effective date of retirement or the date of written notification to the Board of retirement of the member.

A retired member who has elected a joint and last-survivor option may, in a manner prescribed by the Board, revoke such election and elect to receive from time of notification either the retirement allowance to which he would have been entitled had no option been elected initially or an allowance actuarially equivalent thereto under a joint and last-survivor option with a different contingent annuitant, if (i) the original contingent annuitant has died, (ii) a final decree of divorce of the retired member from the original contingent annuitant has been entered, or (iii) the written consent of the original contingent annuitant, together with evidence satisfactory to the Board of the good health of the original contingent annuitant, is submitted with the notification. If the provisions of this subsection are invoked by a retired member on the basis of the member’s having been divorced from his contingent annuitant and the marriage had been of a duration of 20 years or more, the provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable until the death or remarriage of the former spouse unless such spouse consents in writing to the revocation of the option prior to death or remarriage.If such an election is made as a result of the death or divorce of the contingent annuitant, the benefit payable to the retired member may be adjusted retroactively for a period of not more than 60 days from the date the Board first receives notification of the desire of the retired member to make such a change.

Subject to the provisions of subsection E of this section, any member who retires on or after July 1, 1986, and returns to covered employment shall not be entitled to select a different optional benefit upon making application for retirement a second or subsequent time.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.60; 1956, c. 560; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 597; 1976, cc. 511, 542; 1978, c. 841; 1980, cc. 85, 642, 646; 1982, c. 581; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 1992, cc. 518, 548, 811; 1993, c. 548; 1995, cc. 152, 307, 692, 811; 1998, c. 676; 1999, c. 111; 2001, cc. 679, 699; 2003, c. 263; 2005, cc. 146, 162.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 679 and 699, cl. 2 provides: “That any retirement allowance being paid under one of the optional payment plans of §

51.1-165

, as such section existed before the effective date of this act, shall continue to be paid in accordance with such optional payment plan.”

Acts 2005, c. 162, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be applicable to the payment of retirement benefits relating to members who die on or after July 1, 2005.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection E, in the first sentence, substituted “in a manner prescribed by” for “by written notification to”; and in subsection F, inserted “or subsequent.”

The 1999 amendment

added the last sentence in subdivision A 4.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 679 and 699 are identical, and rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “§§

51.1-153

,

51.1-205

, or §

51.1-216

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member” for “§

51.1-153

or §

51.1-205

” in the first paragraph, and inserted “subdivision A 3 of §

51.1-206

, or subdivision A 3 of §

51.1-217

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member” in two places in the second paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 263 substituted “10” for “ten” in subdivision A 2; inserted subdivision A 3; and in subsection E, substituted “20” for “twenty,” and “60” for “sixty.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 146 deleted “51.1-205” in subsections A and B, deleted “subdivision A 3 of §

51.1-206

” twice in the second paragraph of subsection B, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B”; in subdivision C 1, deleted the former third sentence which read:
“For purposes of this subsection, retirement shall be deemed to commence on the effective date of a member’s service retirement or disability,” substituted “Except as provided in subdivision 2 of this subsection, in all cases where” for “If” in the third sentence, added the last sentence; added subdivision C 2, and made minor stylistic changes. See Editor’s note for applicability.

§ 51.1-165.01.
Partial lump-sum option for payment of retirement allowance.

For purposes of this section:“Normal retirement” means normal retirement as described in §§

51.1-153

,

51.1-205

,

51.1-216

or §

51.1-305

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering the member.

The following members are eligible to receive a portion of their retirement allowance paid in a lump-sum distribution upon retirement as provided in this section:

Any retiring member who (i) has satisfied the requirements for normal retirement after January 1, 2004, or has been credited with at least three years of creditable service for service performed after the date he was first eligible for an unreduced service retirement allowance and (ii) was in service for at least three full years after January 1, 2001, is eligible to elect one of the partial lump-sum options described in either subdivision C 1, C 2, or C 3.

Any retiring member who (i) has been credited with at least two years of creditable service for service performed after the date he was first eligible for an unreduced service retirement allowance and (ii) was in service for at least two full years after January 1, 2001, is eligible to elect one of the partial lump-sum options described in either subdivision C 1 or C 2.

Any retiring member who (i) has been credited with at least one year of creditable service for service performed after the date he was first eligible for an unreduced service retirement allowance and (ii) was in service for at least one full year after January 1, 2001, is eligible to elect the partial lump-sum option described in subdivision C 1.For purposes of this subsection, service of an employee of a locality participating in the Retirement System shall mean service for which retirement credit is granted under this chapter.

An eligible retiring member may make a one-time election to receive a portion of his retirement allowance paid in a lump-sum distribution upon his retirement. The monthly amount of the service retirement allowance otherwise payable to such member making the election shall be reduced on an actuarially equivalent basis to reflect the payment of such lump-sum distribution. Any optional payment of the retirement allowance, pursuant to §

51.1-165

, shall also be based upon such reduced retirement allowance. The computation and payment of any service retirement allowance that is reduced on an actuarially equivalent basis to reflect the payment of a lump-sum distribution shall also reflect the provisions of subsection B of §

51.1-168

applicable to the total retirement benefit including the lump-sum distribution. An eligible retiring member may elect one of the following partial lump-sum options pursuant to the limitations provided in subsection B:

A lump-sum distribution shall be paid to such member upon his retirement equal to twelve times the monthly amount of his service retirement allowance as determined in subsection A of §

51.1-155

, subsection A of §

51.1-206

, subsection A of §

51.1-217

, or subsection A of §

51.1-306

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member but without regard to the limitation set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-168

.

A lump-sum distribution shall be paid to such member upon his retirement equal to twenty-four times the monthly amount of his service retirement allowance as determined in subsection A of §

51.1-155

, subsection A of §

51.1-206

, subsection A of §

51.1-217

, or subsection A of §

51.1-306

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member but without regard to the limitation set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-168

.

A lump-sum distribution shall be paid to such member upon his retirement equal to thirty-six times the monthly amount of his service retirement allowance as determined in subsection A of § 51.1-155, subsection A of § 51.1-206, subsection A of § 51.1-217, or subsection A of § 51.1-306, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member but without regard to the limitation set forth in subsection B of § 51.1-168.

The lump-sum distribution, if elected by the eligible retiring member, shall be paid at the same time that the first monthly annuity payment is paid to such member.

Before an eligible retiring member may make an election to receive a lump-sum distribution, such member shall have been provided from the Retirement System the amount by which his monthly retirement allowance shall be reduced under each of the partial lump-sum options provided in subsection C, as available to such member. No eligible retiring member shall be allowed to make an election for a lump-sum distribution pursuant to this section more than once in his lifetime.

The election of any one of the options stated in this section shall be void if the member dies prior to the Board receiving written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement. If the death of the member occurs prior to the effective date of retirement but after the Board has received written notification of the member’s effective date of retirement, benefits shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-163

and the requirement that the member be in service shall not apply.

History.

2001, cc. 679, 699; 2002, c. 404.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 404 deleted “of this section” at the end of subdivisions B 1 through B 3; in the introductory language of subsection C, inserted the fourth sentence and substituted “An eligible retiring” for “Such” at the beginning of the last sentence; in subdivisions C 1 through C 3, inserted “shall be paid to such member upon his retirement” and substituted “but without regard to the limitation set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-168

” for “shall be paid to such member upon his retirement”; and added the second sentence in subsection E.

§ 51.1-165.1.
Acknowledgment by spouse of member.

Any application for retirement benefits under this chapter or Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.) or Chapter 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of this title shall include a statement made by the spouse, if any, of the applicant, acknowledging (i) that the spouse has read the provisions of payment options and (ii) the selection of the basic benefit or any other benefit selected. Payments to a retired member who fails to have executed properly a statement of acknowledgment, and the provisions for obtaining such statement, shall be governed by procedures adopted by the Board.

History.

1996, c. 709; 2009, c. 22.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 22 deleted “acknowledged pursuant to § 55-118.4 or § 55-118.6” preceding “made by the spouse” in the first sentence.

§ 51.1-166.
Post-retirement supplements generally.

In addition to the allowances payable under this title, post-retirement supplements shall be payable to the recipients of such allowances. Supplements shall be subject to the same conditions of payment as are allowances.

The amounts of the post-retirement supplements shall be determined as percentages of the allowances supplemented hereby. The percentages shall be determined annually by reference to the increase in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. The percentages shall be based on monthly averages and shall be the difference between (i) the average for the calendar year just ended and (ii) the average for the most recent calendar year used in the determination of the post-retirement supplements currently being paid. The annual increase, if any, in the CPI-U shall be considered only to the extent of the first two percent plus one-half of the next two percent of any additional increase, or a maximum increase in the post-retirement supplement of three percent in any given year. However, for anyone who (a) is not a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (b) has at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, the applicable annual increase, if any, in the CPI-U shall be considered only to the extent of the first three percent plus one-half of the next four percent of any additional increase, or a maximum increase in the post-retirement supplement of five percent in any given year. If the difference in the percentages determined above is zero or less, the post-retirement supplements shall either not commence or shall continue unchanged until such time as an annual determination results in a difference in the percentages that are greater than zero. A participant in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

shall be considered to be a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, for the purposes of this section.Contribution rates for all employers shall include an amount equal to 100 percent of the total annual amount necessary to fund all post-retirement supplements. All contribution rates shall be computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board.

There shall be no change in the amount of any post-retirement supplement between determination dates except as necessary to reflect changes in the amount of the allowance being supplemented. The post-retirement supplement shall remain a constant percentage of the respective allowance being supplemented. No new post-retirement supplement shall be commenced except as of a determination date. The post-retirement supplement determined as of any determination dates shall become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year and shall be in lieu of any post-retirement supplements previously payable, which shall thereupon be terminated.

Any recipient of an allowance which initially commenced on or prior to January 1, 1990, shall be entitled to post-retirement supplements effective July 1, 1991.
D. 1. Any recipient of an allowance which initially commenced on or prior to January 1, 1990, shall be entitled to post-retirement supplements effective July 1, 1991.

A person who is the recipient of an allowance pursuant to §

2.2-3204

, subsection Q of Item 469 of Chapter 890 of the Acts of Assembly of 2011, or §

51.1-155.1

,

51.1-155.2

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-162

,

51.1-207

,

51.1-218

,

51.1-308

,

51.1-1117

,

51.1-1128

,

51.1-1161

, or

51.1-1169

must receive that allowance for one full calendar year before being entitled to post-retirement supplements.

Any person who, as of January 1, 2013, (i) is the recipient of an allowance under this title or (ii) would otherwise be eligible for an unreduced allowance under the applicable chapter within five years, including a person described in clause (ii) who commences an unreduced allowance on or after January 1, 2013, must receive that allowance for one full calendar year before being entitled to post-retirement supplements.

Any other person who has less than 20 years of creditable service must receive that allowance for one full calendar year after the date he would otherwise have been eligible for an unreduced allowance under the applicable chapter before being entitled to post-retirement supplements.

History.

1970, c. 476, § 51-111.60:1; 1977, c. 620; 1980, c. 163; 1982, c. 467; 1987, cc. 13, 14; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 719; 1996, c. 1030; 2010, cc. 737, 738, 752; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463; 2014, c. 356.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection B, rewrote the fourth sentence, which formerly read: “The annual increase in the Consumer Price Index shall be considered only to the extent of three percent plus one-half of such additional increase up to seven percent.” and inserted the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment by c. 752, rewrote subsection B; and inserted the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection B, substituted “the first two percent plus one-half of the next two percent” for “the first three percent plus one-half of the next four percent” and “supplement of three percent” for “supplement of five percent” in the fourth sentence and rewrote the fifth sentence; and redesignated the provisions of subsection D as present D 1 and added subdivisions D 2 through D 4.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 inserted “51.1-1161, or

51.1-1169

” in subdivision D 2, and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 in subsection B added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

§ 51.1-167.
Retirement allowance to be reduced in certain cases.

In the case of any state employee whose compensation is not paid exclusively out of the state treasury and in the case of any teacher whose compensation is paid out of any fund not derived from local revenues or state appropriations, if any contributor other than the Commonwealth is in default in the payment of any required contribution, the total retirement allowance to which the employee would have been entitled but for the default shall be reduced by the amount of the retirement allowance provided by the defaulted contribution.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.65; 1974, c. 353; 1982, c. 467; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-168.
Limits on creditable compensation; maximum benefits; mandatory payment of allowance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, creditable compensation used for computing any benefit or employee contribution under or to the Retirement System shall not exceed $200,000 (as adjusted in $5,000 increments from time to time by the adjustment factor described in I.R.C. § 415 (d) on the basis of a base period of the calendar quarter beginning July 1, 2001). In determining average final compensation for periods beginning on or after July 1, 2001, the limit on creditable compensation applied to compensation attributable to periods prior to July 1, 2001, shall be $200,000. Notwithstanding the foregoing, compensation for any employee who became a member of the Retirement System (i) prior to the ninetieth day after the opening date of the 1996 Session of the General Assembly, on whose behalf employee or employer contributions are made into the Retirement System, and for whom annual compensation is used for computing any benefit, shall not exceed the limit on compensation as adjusted by the Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the transition provisions applicable to eligible participants under state and local governmental plans under I.R.C. § 401 (a)(17) as amended in 1993 and as contained in § 13212 (d)(3) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 (P. L. 103-66).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual benefit under the Retirement System of a member and any related death or other benefit shall, if necessary, be reduced to the extent required by § 415 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to § 415 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Any adjustment pursuant to § 415 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to all members including those who have died, retired, or otherwise terminated service with a nonforfeitable right to a retirement allowance before the effective date of such adjustment. If an employee participating in the Retirement System is also a participant in another defined benefit plan sponsored or maintained by an employer participating in the Retirement System and subject to the limitations under § 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, such employer shall apply the combined limit test required by § 415 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code to all such plans, to the extent required by § 415 of the Internal Revenue Code. Whenever a reduction in annual benefits is required to meet the annual benefit limit required by § 415 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual benefits under such employer’s other plan or plans will be reduced before benefits under the Retirement System.

Any vendor for a defined benefit plan sponsored or maintained by an employer that participates in the Retirement System shall (i) request and maintain the records needed, (ii) perform the testing services required to assure compliance with the limitations described in § 415 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code, including testing required where the employer maintains or sponsors another plan that must be tested together with the Retirement System, and (iii) advise the employer of any annual benefit that exceeds the applicable limitation. If there is no vendor for these services, the employer shall (a) request and maintain the records needed, (b) perform the testing services required to assure compliance with the limitations described in § 415 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code, including testing required where the employer maintains or sponsors another plan that must be tested together with the Retirement System, and (c) reduce any annual benefit that exceeds the applicable limitation.

On and after January 1, 1989, the retirement allowance of a member who has terminated employment shall begin no later than the later of (i) April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year that the member attains the required age as provided in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or (ii) April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the member terminates employment. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to elect a form of payment by such required beginning date, the retirement allowance shall be paid as a single life annuity and the spousal acknowledgement otherwise required by §

51.1-165.1

shall not be required. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, § 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans are incorporated by reference.

History.

1990, c. 832; 1995, c. 307; 1998, c. 389; 2000, c. 502; 2002, c. 435; 2005, c. 728; 2015, c. 660; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53, 54.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in clause (i), substituted “$265,000” for “$235,840,” and in clause (ii), substituted “$160,000” for “$150,000”; rewrote subsection B; added present subsections C and D; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection E.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 502 inserted the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 435 added “Limits on creditable compensation” at the beginning of the section catchline and rewrote the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 728 inserted the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53 and 54, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “the required age as provided in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,” for “seventy and one-half years of age” in subsection D.